Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2079
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 71-2078 to 71-2082:

(1) Hospital shall have the meaning found in section 71-419; and

(2) Hospital uniform billing form shall mean the Health Care Financing Administration claim form number 1450 mandated for the medicare program pursuant to sections 1814(a)(2) and 1871 of the federal Social Security Act, as amended, developed by the National Uniform Billing Committee and commonly referred to as the uniform billing claim form number 92.

Laws 1993, LB 387, § 2;

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 101.